Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-617
Contract, defined.

Contract means the total legal obligation resulting from the parties' agreement as affected by the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act and other applicable law.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 379.